Utah statutes.
78B-6-402.   Court's general powers.
The provisions of Sections 78B-6-408, 78B-6-409, and 78B-6-410 do not limit or
restrict the exercise of the general powers conferred in Section 78B-6-401 in
any proceeding where declaratory relief is sought, in which a judgment or
decree will terminate the controversy or remove an uncertainty.
